District of Columbia statutes.
10-1141.04a

Repealed

Dedication of public rights-of-way user fees, charges, and penalties.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 604a
as added Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 504(b), 47 DCR 6308
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 6(b), 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(a), 52 DCR 2638
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 112, 52 DCR 10637
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Highway Trust Fund and District Department of Transportation Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-206, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10524).